apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="/ਇਹ__prn">       
      <e><p><l>ਇਹ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਹ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਹ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਸ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਨ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਹਨਾਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਸਤੋਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਸ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਸਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਸਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਸ ਦੀ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਸ ਦੇ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਇਸਦਾ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਸ ਦਾ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦੀ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦੀ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦਾ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਸਨੇ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੇ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਸ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prox"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਇਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
      <e><p><l>ਇਸ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prox"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- adding ਉਹ into the same paradigm -->
      <e><p><l>ਉਹ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਉਹ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਹ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਸ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਸ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਸਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਉਸਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਸ ਦੀ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਸ ਦੇ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਉਸਦਾ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਸ ਦਾ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦੀ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦੇ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਦਾ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਸਨੇ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੇ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਨੇ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਸ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dist"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਉਨ੍ਹਾਂ ਵਿੱਚ</l><r>ਇਹ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dist"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਇਹ"><i></i><par n="/ਇਹ__prn"/></e>
